California, session 20252026, SB1060.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11834.19 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11834.19. A licensee shall not operate an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility within 1,000 feet of a public or private elementary or secondary school or a daycare center if the recovery or treatment facility serves more than six residents and treatment is being provided at the facility.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to protect California’s children who attend daycare centers, preschools, and K–12 public and private schools, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.